Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2872.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ONLINE EARLY CHILDHOOD DEVELOPMENT PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) $750,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $750,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development, in consultation with the commissioner of children, youth, and families, for the purchase and operation of an online early childhood development professional educator program to be available at no cost to early childhood educators, Minnesota residents, and high school students. Of this amount, up to $250,000 each year is for reimbursing participating schools for the expense of supporting the program. School reimbursements must be done on a first-come, first-served basis, though at least 50 percent must go to schools outside the seven-county metropolitan area, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) The program selected must: new text end new text begin (1) include all of the coursework in English or Spanish necessary to earn a child development associate credential upon successful completion; new text end new text begin (2) provide courses allowing for the award of continuing education units accredited by the International Accreditors for Continuing Education and Training; new text end new text begin (3) provide health and safety courses meeting federal annual training requirements under the child care development block grant and the child care and development fund; new text end new text begin (4) be usable for students in high school career and technical programs if requested by school districts; new text end new text begin (5) be based on research and developmentally appropriate practices as defined by national professional organizations such as the National Association for the Education of Young Children; new text end new text begin (6) include content that spans early childhood development from birth to age five and that covers topics such as developmental milestones, health and safety, working with children with special needs, supporting families, the Science of Reading, and running a high-quality early education program; new text end new text begin (7) include videos, interactive games, knowledge checks, and writing assignments; new text end new text begin (8) have a system for program administrators and state agencies to capture course completion data, certification status, and individual and group professional development progress; new text end new text begin (9) be accessible on a range of computers, tablets, and mobile devices; new text end new text begin (10) include professional development opportunities that are both synchronous and asynchronous; new text end new text begin (11) foster a professional learning community with access to early childhood content experts and opportunities to share knowledge with peers around the country; new text end new text begin (12) provide a user-friendly system with support by a customer help desk; and new text end new text begin (13) support a professional development system housed on a learning management system with proven capability to provide reliable simultaneous access to a network of early educators. new text end